North Carolina, session 2025, HB741.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-63 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-63. Registration plates furnished by Division; requirements; replacement of regular
plates with First in Flight plates, First in Freedom plates, or National/State
Mottos plates; surrender and reissuance; displaying; preservation and cleaning;
alteration or concealment of numbers; commission contracts for issuance.
…
(b1) The following special registration plates do not have to be a "First in Flight" plate,
"First in Freedom" plate, or "National/State Mottos" plate as provided in subsection (b) of this
section. The design of the plates that are not "First in Flight" plates, "First in Freedom" plates, or
"National/State Mottos" plate must be developed in accordance with G.S. 20-79.4(a3). For
special plates authorized in G.S. 20-79.7 on or after July 1, 2013, the Division may not issue the
plate on a background under this subsection unless it receives the required number of applications
set forth in G.S. 20-79.3A(a).
…
(30a) Military Veteran.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 20-79.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-79.4. Special registration plates.
…
(b) Types. – The Division shall issue the following types of special registration plates:
…
(130) Military Veteran. – Issuable to an individual who served honorably in the
Armed Forces of the United States. The plate shall bear (i) the words "U.S.
Military Veteran" across the top of the plate and (ii) the name and insignia of
the branch of service in which the individual served. served on the left side of
the plate. The plate authorized by this subdivision is not subject to the
provisions of G.S. 20-79.3A or G.S. 20-79.8.
…."
*H741-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 741-First Edition